Utah statutes.
57-26-108.   Enforcement by notification to assignor.
(1)  Upon the assignor's default, or as otherwise agreed by the assignor, the
assignee may give the assignor a notification demanding that the assignor pay
over the proceeds of any rents that the assignee is entitled to collect under
Section 57-26-106.  The assignee shall also give a copy of the notification to
any other person that, ten days before the notification date, held a recorded
assignment of rents arising from the real property.
(2)  If an assignee enforces an assignment of rents under this section, the
date of enforcement is the date on which the assignor receives a notification
under Subsection (1).
(3)  An assignee's failure to give a notification under Subsection (1) to any
person holding a recorded assignment of rents does not affect the
effectiveness of the notification as to the assignor, but the other person is
entitled to any relief permitted under law of this state other than this
chapter.
(4)  An assignee that holds a security interest in rents solely by virtue of
Subsection 57-26-104(1) may not enforce the security interest under this
section while the assignor occupies the real property as the assignor's
primary residence.
